Utah statutes.
31A-2-215.   Consumer education.

(1)  In furtherance of the purposes in Section 31A-1-102, the commissioner may educate consumers about insurance and provide consumer assistance.

(2)  Consumer education may include:

(a)  outreach activities; and

(b)  the production or collection and dissemination of educational materials.

(3) (a)  Consumer assistance may include explaining:

(i)  the terms of a policy;

(ii)  a policy's complaint, grievance, or adverse benefit determination procedure; and

(iii)  the fundamentals of self-advocacy.

(b)  Notwithstanding Subsection (3)(a), consumer assistance may not include testifying or representing a consumer in any grievance or adverse benefit determination, arbitration, judicial, or related proceeding, unless the proceeding is in connection with an enforcement action brought under Section 31A-2-308.

(4)  The commissioner may adopt rules necessary to implement the requirements of this section.

